Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Chapter 13.2. Standards of Quality.
§ 22.1-253.13:8.
Compliance.

The Standards of Quality prescribed in this chapter shall be the only standards of quality required by Article VIII, Section 2 of the Constitution of Virginia.

Each local school board shall provide, as a minimum, the programs and services, as provided in the Standards of Quality prescribed above, with state and local funds as apportioned by the General Assembly in the appropriation act and to the extent funding is provided by the General Assembly.

Each local school board shall report its compliance with the Standards of Quality to the Board of Education annually. The report of compliance shall be submitted to the Board of Education by the chairman of the local school board and the division superintendent.

Noncompliance with the Standards of Quality shall be included in the Board of Education’s annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly as required by § 22.1-18.

As required by § 22.1-18, the Board of Education shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a report on the condition and needs of public education in the Commonwealth and shall identify any school divisions and the specific schools therein that have failed to establish and maintain schools meeting the existing prescribed Standards of Quality.

The Board of Education shall have authority to seek school division compliance with the foregoing Standards of Quality. When the Board of Education determines that a school division has failed or refused, and continues to fail or refuse, to comply with any such Standard, the Board may petition the circuit court having jurisdiction in the school division to mandate or otherwise enforce compliance with such standard, including the development or implementation of any required corrective action plan that a local school board has failed or refused to develop or implement in a timely manner.

History.

1988, cc. 645, 682; 1990, cc. 820, 839; 2004, cc. 939, 955, 965; 2005, cc. 331, 450.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s notes under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 939 and 955 are identical, and substituted “in this chapter” for “above” in the first paragraph; substituted “appropriation” for “appropriations” in the second paragraph; inserted the next-to-last paragraph; and deleted “defendant” at the end of the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2004 amendment by c. 965 rewrote the last paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 331 and 450 are identical, and substituted “Standards of Quality” for “standards of quality” in the second and next-to-last paragraphs; and added the third and fourth paragraphs.

§ 22.1-253.13:9.
Exemplar School Recognition Program.

Schools and local school divisions shall be recognized by the Board of Education in accordance with guidelines it shall establish for the Exemplar School Recognition Program (the Program). The Program shall be designed to recognize and reward (i) schools that exceed Board-established requirements or show continuous improvement on academic and school quality indicators and (ii) schools, school divisions, and school boards that implement effective, innovative practices that are aligned with the Commonwealth’s goals for public education. Such recognition may include:

Public announcements recognizing individual schools and divisions;

Tangible rewards;

Waivers of certain board regulations;

Exemptions from certain reporting requirements; or

Other commendations deemed appropriate to recognize high achievement.In addition to Board recognition, local school boards shall adopt policies to recognize individual schools through public announcements or media releases as well as other appropriate recognition.

History.

2010, cc. 38, 103; 2011, cc. 119, 145; 2012, c. 794; 2015, c. 566; 2019, c. 576; 2020, c. 688.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, cc. 38 and 103, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall include in its guidelines for the VIP incentive program performance objectives and measures that promote student achievement in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
“associate degree from a comprehensive community college” was substituted for “associate’s degree from a
community college” to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

Acts 2019, c. 576, cl. 2 provides: “That pursuant to the provisions of this act, the Board of Education shall replace the existing Virginia Index of Performance (VIP) incentive program with the Exemplar School Recognition Program.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 119 and 145 are identical, and added the last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 764 added subsection D.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 566 substituted “waiver from accreditation” for “waiver from annual accreditation” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 576 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 688 deleted the subsection A designation and deleted subsection B, which read: “A school that maintains a passing rate on Virginia assessment program tests or additional tests approved by the Board of 95 percent or above in each of the four core academic areas for two consecutive years may, upon application to the Department of Education, receive a waiver from accreditation. A school receiving such a waiver shall be fully accredited for a three-year period. However, such school shall continue to annually submit documentation in compliance with the pre-accreditation eligibility requirements.”

§ 22.1-253.13:10.
Repealed by Acts 2019, c. 771, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 22.1-253.13:10, pertaining to the Standards of Learning Innovation Committee, derived from 2014, cc. 585, 622; 2016, c. 648.

Acts 2019, cc. 139 and 796 also amended former § 22.1-253.13:10 to substitute “school counselor” for “school guidance counselor.”